Colorado statutes. TITLE 17 Corrections
PART 4
PAROLE ELIGIBILITY AND DISCHARGE FROM CUSTODY

Law reviews:

For article, "1990

C

riminal Law Legislative Update", see 19

C

olo. Law. 2049 (1990).

17-22.5-401. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby declares that if any inmate does not demonstrate positive behavior during incarceration, such inmate should be required to serve out the full sentence imposed upon such inmate. If any inmate does demonstrate positive behavior during incarceration, such inmate should be considered for release from incarceration prior to the end of the full sentence imposed upon him. Therefore, the general assembly, in enacting this part 4, intends to provide standards whereby any inmate can earn a reduction of incarceration time and to provide incentives for inmates to demonstrate positive behavior during incarceration.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire part added, p. 946, § 19, effective June 7.

17-22.5-402. Discharge from custody.

No inmate shall be discharged from the department until he has remained the full term for which he was sentenced, to be computed on and after the date upon which the sentence becomes effective and excluding any time the inmate may have been at large by reason of escape therefrom, unless he is pardoned or otherwise released by legal authority.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the full term for which an inmate is sentenced shall be reduced by any earned release time and earned time granted pursuant to section 17-22.5-405, except as provided in section 17-22.5-403 (3) and (3.5).

This part 4 shall not apply to any offender to whom section 17-22.5-104 (2)(a), (2)(b), (2)(c), (2)(d)(I), (2)(d)(II), or (2)(d)(III) applies.

A person discharged from a correctional facility without supervision is eligible to receive reentry support services from the department or community-based organizations that receive funding from the department to provide reentry services for up to one year after the person's date of discharge.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire part added, p. 947, § 19, effective June 7.

L. 2004:

(2) amended, p. 1741, § 2, effective June 4.

L. 2006:

(3) amended, p. 1053, § 4, effective May 25.

L. 2009:

(2) amended, (HB 09-1351), ch. 359, p. 1867, § 2, effective June 1.

L. 2019:

(4) added, (SB 19-143), ch. 286, p. 2659, § 5, effective May 28.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2006 act amending subsection (3), see section 1 of chapter 228, Session Laws of Colorado 2006.

17-22.5-403. Parole eligibility.

Any person sentenced for a class 2, class 3, class 4, class 5, or class 6 felony, or a level 1, level 2, level 3, or level 4 drug felony, or any unclassified felony shall be eligible for parole after such person has served fifty percent of the sentence imposed upon such person, less any time authorized for earned time granted pursuant to section 17-22.5-405. However, the date established by this subsection (1) upon which any person shall be eligible for parole may be extended by the executive director for misconduct during incarceration. The executive director shall promulgate rules and regulations concerning when and under what conditions any inmate's parole eligibility date may be extended. Such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in such a manner as to promote fairness and consistency in the treatment of all inmates.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, any person convicted and sentenced for second degree murder, first degree assault, first degree kidnapping unless the first degree kidnapping is a class 1 felony, first or second degree sexual assault, first degree arson, first degree burglary, or aggravated robbery, committed on or after June 7, 1990, and before July 1, 2004, which person has previously been convicted of a crime which would have been a crime of violence as defined in section 18-1.3-406, C.R.S., shall be eligible for parole after such person has served seventy-five percent of the sentence imposed upon such person, less any time authorized for earned time granted pursuant to section 17-22.5-405.

The provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall not apply to persons sentenced pursuant to part 10 of article 1.3 of title 18, C.R.S.

A person who is convicted as an adult of a class 1 felony following a direct filing of an information or indictment in the district court pursuant to section 19-2.5-801, or transfer of proceedings to the district court pursuant to section 19-2.5-802, or pursuant to either of these sections as they existed prior to their repeal and reenactment, with amendments, by House Bill 96-1005, which felony was committed on or after July 1, 1990, and before July 1, 2006, and who is resentenced pursuant to section 18-1.3-401 (4)(c), is not entitled to receive any reduction of the person's sentence pursuant to this section.

Repealed.

(2.5) (a) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, any person convicted and sentenced for second degree murder, first degree assault, first degree kidnapping unless the first degree kidnapping is a class 1 felony, first degree arson, first degree burglary, or aggravated robbery, committed on or after July 1, 2004, shall be eligible for parole after such person has served seventy-five percent of the sentence imposed upon such person, less any time authorized for earned time granted pursuant to section 17-22.5-405.

The provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2.5) shall only apply to:

A person convicted and sentenced for a crime listed in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2.5) that is a class 2 or class 3 felony offense; or

A person convicted and sentenced for a crime listed in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2.5) that is a class 4 or class 5 felony offense, which person has previously been convicted of a crime of violence as defined in section 18-1.3-406, C.R.S.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) or (2) of this section, any person convicted and sentenced for any crime enumerated in subsection (2) of this section, committed on or after June 7, 1990, and before July 1, 2004, who has twice previously been convicted for a crime which would have been a crime of violence as defined in section 18-1.3-406, C.R.S., shall be eligible for parole after such person has served seventy-five percent of the sentence served upon such person, at which time such person shall be referred by the department to the state board of parole which may place such person on parole for a period of time which does not exceed the time remaining on such person's original sentence. For offenses committed on or after July 1, 1993, such person shall be placed on parole for the period of time specified in section 18-1.3-401 (1)(a)(V), C.R.S. Section 17-22.5-402 (2) shall not apply to any such offender.

(3.5) (a) Notwithstanding subsection (1) or (2.5) of this section, any person convicted and sentenced for any crime enumerated in subsection (2.5) of this section, committed on or after July 1, 2004, who has previously been convicted for a crime which would have been a crime of violence as defined in section 18-1.3-406, C.R.S., shall be eligible for parole after such person has served seventy-five percent of the sentence served upon such person, at which time such person shall be referred by the department to the state board of parole which may place the person on parole for the period of time specified in section 18-1.3-401 (1)(a)(V), C.R.S. Section 17-22.5-402 (2) shall not apply to any such offender.

The provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3.5) shall only apply to:

A person convicted and sentenced for a crime listed in paragraph (a) of subsection (2.5) of this section that is a class 2 or class 3 felony offense; or

A person convicted and sentenced for a crime listed in paragraph (a) of subsection (2.5) of this section that is a class 4 or class 5 felony offense, which person has twice previously been convicted of a crime of violence as defined in section 18-1.3-406, C.R.S.

The governor may grant parole to an inmate to whom subsection (2) or (3) of this section applies prior to such inmate's parole eligibility date or discharge date if, in the governor's opinion, extraordinary mitigating circumstances exist and such inmate's release from institutional custody is compatible with the safety and welfare of society.

(4.5) (a) After considering any relevant evidence presented by any person or agency and considering the presumptions set forth in section 17-34-102 (8), the governor may grant early parole to an offender to whom subsection (1) or (2.5) of this section applies when the offender successfully completes the specialized program described in section 17-34-102 if, in the governor's opinion, extraordinary mitigating circumstances exist and the offender's release from institutional custody is compatible with the safety and welfare of society.

When an offender applies for early parole pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (4.5) after having successfully completed the specialized program described in section 17-34-102, the offender shall make his or her application to the governor's office with notice and a copy of the application sent to the state board of parole created in section 17-2-201. The state board of parole shall review the offender's application and all supporting documents and schedule a hearing if the board considers making a recommendation for early parole, at which hearing any victim must have the opportunity to be heard, pursuant to section 24-4.1-302.5 (1)(j), C.R.S. Not later than ninety days after receipt of a copy of an offender's application for early parole, the state board of parole, after considering the presumptions set forth in section 17-34-102 (8), shall make a recommendation to the governor concerning whether early parole should be granted to the offender.

The department, in consultation with the state board of parole, shall develop any necessary policies and procedures to implement this subsection (4.5), including procedures for providing notice to any victim, as required by sections 24-4.1-302.5 (1)(j) and 24-4.1-303 (14), C.R.S., and to the district attorney's office that prosecuted the crime for which the offender was sentenced.

For any offender who is incarcerated for an offense committed prior to July 1, 1993, upon application for parole, the state board of parole, working in conjunction with the department and using the guidelines established pursuant to section 17-22.5-404, shall determine whether or not to grant parole and, if granted, the length of the period of parole. Prior to the parole release hearing, the division of adult parole shall conduct a parole plan investigation and inform the state board of parole of the results of the investigation. If the state board of parole finds an inmate's parole plan inadequate, it shall table the parole release decision and inform the director of the division of adult parole that the parole plan is inadequate. The director of the division of adult parole shall ensure that a revised parole plan that addresses the deficiencies in the original parole plan is submitted to the parole board within thirty days after the notification. The parole board is responsible for monitoring the department's compliance with this provision and shall notify the director of the division of adult parole if a revised parole plan is not submitted to the parole board within thirty days. The state board of parole may set the length of the period of parole for any time period up to the date of final discharge as determined in accordance with section 17-22.5-402. If an application for parole is refused by the state board of parole, the state board of parole shall reconsider within one year thereafter whether such inmate should be granted parole. The state board of parole shall continue such reconsideration each year thereafter until such inmate is granted parole or until such inmate is discharged pursuant to law; except that:

If the inmate applying for parole was convicted of any class 3 sexual offense described in part 4 of article 3 of title 18, C.R.S., a habitual criminal offense as defined in section 18-1.3-801 (2.5), C.R.S., or of any offense subject to the requirements of section 18-1.3-904, C.R.S., the board need only reconsider granting parole to such inmate once every three years, until the board grants such inmate parole or until such inmate is discharged pursuant to law; or

If the inmate was convicted of a class 1 or class 2 felony that constitutes a crime of violence, as defined in section 18-1.3-406, C.R.S., the board need only reconsider granting parole to such inmate once every five years, until the board grants such inmate parole or until such inmate is discharged pursuant to law.

For persons who are granted parole pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, the division of adult parole shall provide parole supervision and assistance in securing employment, housing, and such other services as may effect the successful reintegration of such offender into the community while recognizing the need for public safety. The conditions for parole for any such offender under this subsection (6) shall be established pursuant to section 17-22.5-404 by the state board of parole prior to such offender's release from incarceration. Upon a determination in a parole revocation proceeding that the conditions of parole have been violated, the state board of parole shall continue the parole in effect, modify the conditions of parole if circumstances then shown to exist require such modifications, which circumstances shall be set forth in writing, or revoke the parole and order the return of the offender to a place of confinement designated by the executive director for any period of time up to the period remaining on such person's sentence, including the remainder of the offender's natural life if applicable, until the discharge date as determined by section 17-22.5-402 or one year, whichever is longer. In computing the period of reincarceration for an offender other than an offender sentenced for a nonviolent felony offense, as defined in section 17-22.5-405 (5), the time between the offender's release on parole and return to custody in Colorado for revocation of such parole shall not be considered to be part of the term of the sentence. The state board of parole may discharge an offender granted parole under this section at any time during the term of parole upon a determination that the offender has been sufficiently rehabilitated and reintegrated into society and can no longer benefit from parole supervision.

For any offender who is incarcerated for an offense committed on or after July 1, 1993, upon application for parole, the state board of parole, working in conjunction with the department and using the guidelines established pursuant to section 17-22.5-404, shall determine whether or not to grant parole. The state board of parole, if it determines that placing an offender on parole is appropriate, shall set the length of the period of parole at the mandatory period of parole established in section 18-1.3-401 (1)(a)(V) or 18-1.3-401.5 (2)(a), C.R.S., except as otherwise provided for specified offenses in section 17-2-201 (5)(a), (5)(a.5), and (5)(a.7).

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (7), for any sex offender, as defined in section 18-1.3-1003 (4), C.R.S., who is sentenced pursuant to the provisions of part 10 of article 1.3 of title 18, C.R.S., for commission of a sex offense committed on or after November 1, 1998, the state board of parole shall determine whether or not to grant parole as provided in section 18-1.3-1006, C.R.S. If the state board of parole determines that placing a sex offender on parole is appropriate, it shall set an indeterminate period of parole as provided in section 18-1.3-1006, C.R.S.

If the state board of parole does not grant parole pursuant to subsection (7)(a) or (7)(b) of this section because it finds an inmate's parole plan inadequate, it shall table the parole release decision and inform the director of the division of adult parole that the parole plan is inadequate. The director of the division of adult parole shall ensure that a revised parole plan that addresses the deficiencies in the original parole plan is submitted to the parole board within thirty days after the notification. The parole board is responsible for monitoring the department's compliance with this provision and shall notify the director of the division of adult parole if a revised parole plan is not submitted to the parole board within thirty days.

For persons who are granted parole pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (7) of this section, the division of adult parole shall provide parole supervision and assistance in securing employment, housing, and such other services as may affect the successful reintegration of such offender into the community while recognizing the need for public safety. The conditions for parole for any such offender under this paragraph (a) shall be established pursuant to section 17-22.5-404 by the state board of parole prior to such offender's release from incarceration. Upon a determination that the conditions of parole have been violated in a parole revocation proceeding, the state board of parole shall continue the parole in effect, modify the conditions of parole if circumstances then shown to exist require such modifications, which circumstances shall be set forth in writing, or revoke the parole and order the return of the offender to a place of confinement designated by the executive director for any period of time up to the period remaining on such person's mandatory period of parole established in section 18-1.3-401 (1)(a)(V) or 18-1.3-401.5 (2)(a), C.R.S. Any offender who has been reincarcerated due to a parole revocation pursuant to this paragraph (a) shall be eligible for parole at any time during such reincarceration. The state board of parole may discharge an offender granted parole under this section at any time during the term of parole upon a determination that the offender has been sufficiently rehabilitated and reintegrated into society and can no longer benefit from parole supervision. In making any such determination, the state board of parole shall make written findings as to why such offender is no longer in need of parole supervision.

For sex offenders, as defined in section 18-1.3-1003 (4), C.R.S., who are convicted of an offense committed on or after November 1, 1998, and who are granted parole pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (7) of this section, the division of adult parole shall provide parole supervision and assistance in securing employment, housing, and such other services as may affect the successful reintegration of the sex offender into the community while recognizing the need for public safety. The conditions for parole for any sex offender shall be established pursuant to section 18-1.3-1006, C.R.S., and section 17-22.5-404 by the state board of parole prior to the sex offender's release from incarceration. Upon a determination in a parole revocation proceeding that the sex offender has violated the conditions of parole, the state board of parole shall continue the parole in effect, modify the conditions of parole if circumstances then shown to exist require such modifications, which circumstances shall be set forth in writing, or revoke the parole and order the return of the sex offender to a place of confinement designated by the executive director for any period of time up to the remainder of the sex offender's natural life. The revocation hearing shall be held and the state board of parole shall make its determination as provided in section 18-1.3-1010, C.R.S. The state board of parole may discharge a sex offender from parole as provided in section 18-1.3-1006 (3), C.R.S.

The state board of parole shall consider the parole of a person whose parole is revoked either for a technical violation or based on a self-revocation at least once within one hundred eighty days after the revocation if the person's release date is more than nine months from the date of the person's revocation; except that a person whose parole is revoked based on a technical violation that involved the use of a weapon shall not be considered for parole for one year.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire part added, p. 947, § 19, effective June 7.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1730, § 11, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 1978, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(5) and (7) amended, p. 2597, § 7, effective June 3.

L. 95:

(6) amended, p. 878, § 13, effective May 24.

L. 98:

(9) added, p. 1445, § 37, effective July 1; (7) and (8) amended, p. 1291, § 12, effective November 1.

L. 2000:

(6), (8), and (9)(c) amended, p. 854, § 63, effective May 24.

L. 2002:

(7)(a) amended, p. 125, § 3, effective March 26; (2), (3), (5), (7)(a), (7)(b), (8)(a), (8)(b), and (9)(a) amended, p. 1504, § 164, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(2) amended, p. 975, § 10, effective April 17; (7)(a) amended, p. 813, § 2, effective July 1; (9) amended, p. 2677, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(2) and (3) amended and (2.5) and (3.5) added, p. 1739, § 1, effective June 4.

L. 2008:

(6) amended, p. 1756, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(1), (7)(a), and (8)(a) amended, (SB 13-250), ch. 333, p.1932, § 49, effective October 1.

L. 2015:

(5), (6), (7), and (8)(b) amended, (HB 15-1122), ch. 37, p. 89, § 5, effective March 20.

L. 2016:

(2)(c) added, (SB 16-181), ch. 353, p. 1449, § 3, effective June 10; (4.5) added, (SB 16-180), ch. 352, p. 1443, § 3, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

IP(5) amended, (HB 17-1326), ch. 394, p. 2030, § 5, effective August 9.

L. 2019:

IP(5) amended and (7)(c) added, (SB 19-143), ch. 286, p. 2660, § 6, effective May 28.

L. 2021:

(2)(c)(I) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 716, § 34, effective October 1.

17-22.5-403.5. Special needs parole.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a special needs offender, as defined in section 17-1-102 (7.5)(a), may be eligible for parole prior to or after the offender's parole eligibility date pursuant to this section if:

The department determines that the inmate is a special needs offender; and

The state board of parole determines that the special needs offender is not likely to pose a risk to public safety and approves a special needs parole plan that ensures appropriate supervision of and continuity of medical care for the special needs offender.

This section shall apply to any inmate applying for parole on or after July 1, 2001, regardless of when the inmate was sentenced. The provisions of this section shall not affect the length of the parole period to which a special needs offender would otherwise be subject.

The department is responsible for identifying inmates who are special needs offenders and shall submit a referral to the state board of parole for all special needs offenders. If notification to the district attorney is required pursuant to subsection (3)(c)(II) of this section, the inmate shall authorize the department to release the information described in subsections (3)(b)(I) and (3)(b)(I.5) of this section to the district attorney. An inmate or inmate liaison, if the inmate is unable to, may also request that the department make a determination of whether an inmate is eligible for special needs parole and the department shall make a determination within thirty days after receiving the request, unless a competency evaluation has been requested. The department, in consultation with the state board of parole, shall develop any necessary policies and procedures regarding special needs parole to ensure that:

Roles and responsibilities of employees and any contractors involved in special needs parole are clearly defined, employees and any contractors are adequately trained, and performance measures are developed;

Any inmate who is a special needs offender is identified in a timely manner at any point in the inmate's term of incarceration;

Adequate tracking and quality assurance processes are in place so that referrals and any re-referrals, if applicable, are complete and submitted to the parole board in a timely manner;

Formal mechanisms are in place to facilitate effective communication between the department and the parole board, including but not limited to timely responses from the department to requests from the parole board for additional information or for a revised parole plan prior to the parole board's decision or the conditions under which the parole board would consider a second or subsequent referral for special needs parole, if applicable; and

Data collection and data sharing between the department and the parole board are adequate to actively monitor the status of referrals and parole board decisions on a regular basis.

If an inmate meets the eligibility requirements pursuant to section 17-1-102, the department shall submit a referral to the board that, in addition to the requirements of section 17-22.5-404 (4)(a), shall include:

A summary of the inmate's medical, physical, or mental condition, including any diagnosis;

(I.5) Criminal history; risk and needs assessment scores; institutional disciplinary history; work history; an inmate's participation in any programs, treatment, vocational training, or education; and other relevant information regarding risk and risk-reduction factors and any additional relevant information that is requested by the parole board that is in the possession of the department;

The details of a special needs parole plan recommended by the department;

A statement by the inmate or inmate liaison if the inmate is unable to submit a statement; and

A victim impact statement and response from the district attorney that prosecuted the offender, if received pursuant to subsection (3)(c) of this section.

The department shall provide a copy of the referral packet submitted to the parole board to the inmate or inmate liaison, except for the victim impact statement and response from the district attorney. The inmate or inmate liaison has thirty calendar days to submit additional health records or other relevant information not included in the referral packet to the department for submission to the parole board prior to the parole board's decision.

If the department determines the inmate is a special needs offender, the department shall provide notification to any victim, as required pursuant to section 24-4.1-302.5. A victim shall have thirty days after receiving notification to submit a victim impact statement to the department. The department shall include any victim impact statement in the referral to the state board of parole.

At the same time that the department completes the notification required by subsection (3)(c)(I) of this section, the department shall notify and provide information required by subsections (3)(b)(I) and (3)(b)(I.5) of this section to the district attorney that prosecuted the offender if the offender is serving a sentence for a conviction of a crime of violence as described in section 18-1.3-406, or a sex offense as listed in section 16-22-102 (9)(j), (9)(k), (9)(l), (9)(n), (9)(o), (9)(p), (9)(q), (9)(r), or (9)(s). A district attorney shall have thirty days after receiving notification to submit a response to the department. The department shall include any district attorney response in the referral to the state board of parole.

The state board of parole shall consider an inmate for special needs parole upon referral by the department.

The state board of parole shall make a determination of the risk of reoffense that the inmate poses after considering the factors in section 17-22.5-404 (4)(a), as well as the nature and severity of the inmate's medical or physical condition, the age of the inmate, the ability of the department to adequately provide necessary medical or behavioral health treatment, the inmate's risk and needs assessment scores, the nature and severity of the offense for which the inmate is currently incarcerated, the inmate's criminal history, the inmate's institutional conduct, program and treatment participation, and other relevant risk and risk-reduction factors.

The state board of parole may schedule a hearing on the application for special needs parole with the inmate present, or the board may review the application and issue a decision without a hearing, pursuant to section 17-2-201 (4)(f).

The state board of parole shall make a determination of whether to grant special needs parole within thirty calendar days after receiving the referral from the department. The parole board may delay the decision in order to request that the department modify the special needs parole plan. The parole board shall not deny parole based solely on the lack of a recommended parole plan. If the parole board considers an inmate to be an appropriate candidate for release except for the lack of a recommended parole plan, the parole board shall delay the release hearing decision or render a conditional release decision and request that the department submit a revised parole plan within thirty calendar days. If the parole board denies parole, it may inform the department that the inmate should not be referred for a second or subsequent application for special needs parole unless the inmate's medical or mental health status further deteriorates.

The department shall provide a monthly report, by facility, the number of special needs parole applications submitted to the parole board, the decision by the parole board, how many applications are pending, the average length of time the decision has been pending, and the general reason for delaying the decision if that is known to the department. The information must be provided both for the reporting month and year to date.

If, prior to or during any parole hearing, the department or any member of the parole board has a substantial and good-faith reason to believe that the offender is incompetent to proceed, as defined in section 16-8.5-101 (12), the parole board shall suspend all proceedings and notify the public defender liaison described in section 21-1-104 (6). The office of state public defender shall be appointed by the court to represent the inmate and shall file a written motion with the trial court that imposed the sentence to determine competency. The motion must contain a certificate of counsel stating that the motion is based on a good-faith belief that the inmate is incompetent to proceed. The motion must set forth the specific facts that have formed the basis for the motion. The court shall seal the motion. The court shall follow all the relevant procedures in article 8.5 of title 16 regarding the determination of competency. The presence of the inmate is not required unless there is good cause shown.

A denial of special needs parole by the state board of parole does not affect an inmate's eligibility for any other form of parole or release under applicable law.

(4.5) If an offender is determined to be incompetent to proceed pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the court may order the department to provide or arrange for the delivery of appropriate restoration services in any setting authorized by law, by an order of the court, or by any other action as provided by law, including civil commitment. Nothing in this section requires the department of human services to take physical custody of an offender for restoration services. The department of human services is not responsible for conducting the competency evaluation. If the court determines that there is not a substantial probability of the offender being restored to competency, the department may refer the inmate for special needs parole with a special needs parole plan pursuant to this section and notify the public defender liaison described in section 21-1-104 (6).

The parole board may consider the application for special needs parole pursuant to the proceedings set forth in section 17-2-201 (4)(f) or 17-2-201 (9)(a). The board may deny parole only by a majority vote if the board finds that granting parole would create a threat to public safety and that the offender is likely to commit an offense.

The department shall not have any responsibility for the payment of medical care for any offender upon the offender's release; except that, prior to or upon release, any inmate who is sixty-five years of age or older and has been approved for special needs parole must be enrolled in the most appropriate medical insurance benefit plan including medicare, medicare savings plan, veteran's benefit, or other safety-net health insurance, or an individual health benefit plan prior to or upon release, whichever will offer the more immediate health-care coverage. The department shall pay any insurance premiums and penalties for up to six months from the start of coverage. The department may provide financial assistance for longer than six months if the person is still under the jurisdiction of the department and would otherwise be uninsured or underinsured without that financial assistance.

For any offender who is granted special needs parole pursuant to this section, the state board of parole shall set the length of the parole for an appropriate time period of at least six months but not exceeding thirty-six months. At any time during the offender's parole, the state board of parole may revise the duration of the parole. However, in no case may such an offender be required to serve a period of parole in excess of the period of parole to which he or she would otherwise be sentenced pursuant to section 18-1.3-401 (1)(a)(V)(A), or thirty-six months, whichever is less.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 1495, § 2, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2003:

IP(1) amended and (3) added, p. 1910, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (SB 11-241), ch. 200, p. 836, § 6, effective May 23.

L. 2012:

(3)(c)(II) amended, (HB 12-1310), ch. 268, p. 1401, § 22, effective June 7.

L. 2013:

IP(1) amended, (SB 13-229), ch. 272, p. 1429, § 6, effective July 1; IP(1) amended, (HB 13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1715, § 153, effective August 7.

L. 2018:

(4)(d) and (5) amended and (4.5) and (7) added, (HB 18-1109), ch. 139, p. 913, § 2, effective April 23.

L. 2019:

(4)(d) amended, (SB 19-223), ch. 227, p. 2292, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(1), (3), (4)(b), (4)(d), (4)(e), (4.5), (5), and (6) amended and (4)(f), (4)(g), and (8) added, (SB 21-146), ch. 459, p. 3078, § 2, effective July 6.

Editor's note:

Subsection (8)(b) provided for the repeal of subsection (8), effective July 1, 2022. (See L. 2021, p. 3078.)